District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-3506

Right to strike or picket not abrogated.

Repealed.

Dec. 17, 1941, 55 Stat. 810, ch. 589, § 6
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275,§ 9(b), 44 DCR 1408
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 216, 56 DCR 7413
1981 Ed., § 22-3306.
1973 Ed., § 22-3306.
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).